lexiconNZ.lexd
PATTERNS
Regular

LEXICON Roots(2)
beb(b)sush(p)mem(b)ful(b) besh(f):n
sos(p)kag(b)luv(f)gil(p)ses(t) tal(t):n't
bif(t)wezh(f)fal(p)sab(p) guf(b):na
gal(t)bob(p)fuf(f)cel(p) tas(b):na-dene
pup(p)wu!(f)fif(f) pif(p):nab
bat(b)lan(b)sos(f)*af(f) zhof(f):nabalus
ref(b)kon(b)zhof(b)ceb(f)shav(f) bel(f):nabob
los(t)fof(p)!uv(f)sef(f) bor(p):naboom
su!(f)bab(f)bib(p) *ob(p):nabu
buzh(b)fip(f)be(t)fur(t) sos(f):nabumetone
suc(p)gul(f)lav(f)fil(t) gesh(p):nacelle
ful(f)bes(f)bu!(f)lus(p)shuk(f) !es(p):nacho
cuv(f)vap(p)pal(t)baf(t)us(f) dis(f):nacimiento
lef(b)far(t)ser(b)fof(p)fo!(b) dam(t):nacre
bod(p)vub(p)lub(t)pib(t) fic(b):nacreous
bew(b)gun(t)gob(b)nof(t)fal(t) tat(b):nadir
fiw(b)pob(f)fet(t)luf(t)ris(b) bof(p):nadolol
sow(b)pat(b)sel(f)sap(t)cel(t) nif(t):naemorhedus
luk(p)sep(b)la!(f)fef(f) gep(b):naevose
sar(f)led(t)!u*(b)sog(t) fib(b):nag
nis(p)pov(t)pal(t)las(p) tut(p):naga
bef(p)pis(p)bob(b)bef(b) bil(p):nagami
fo!(p)fo!(b)sif(b)pav(p) mos(b):nagari
bus(b)fip(t)nus(f)pezh(b)pup(f) !ep(b):nagasaki
sat(b)pub(t)civ(f)fuv(f)ge!(t) laf(t):nageia
ba*(t)fas(f)miv(b) fas(b):nager
tazh(p)sul(t)luf(f)zhev(f)bop(b) lef(p):nagi
mos(f)fal(p)wev(t) fel(p):nahuatl
fab(b)fap(p)fe*(t)tuw(t) fob(p):naiad
sis(b)gis(f)fub(t)fur(f) pim(f):naiadaceae
bol(f)gif(f)peb(b)faf(p)vil(p) vef(t):naiadales
fup(t)fal(b)sov(f) fub(b):naiant
vuf(p)zhov(b)gis(p)zhuv(f) fas(f):naias
lep(t)sil(b)pep(t)biv(b) fizh(f):naik
pol(t)ros(f)bif(p)baf(b) *ib(t):naiki
fip(f)rop(p)vev(f)sik(p) naf(b):nail
fes(t)pob(b)lof(b) dub(p):nailbrush
*ef(b)sob(f)but(f)bab(f)ve!(b) fub(f):nailed
pum(t)sav(t)dif(t) biv(b):nailery
shaf(b)nes(b)vov(t)bow(f)sob(f) besh(p):nailfile
lev(t)get(f)vuv(f)fec(t) sil(b):nailhead
lef(t)!ef(b)zhaf(t) fiv(b):nails
pem(f)fip(b)fis(p)bob(t) gub(t):nainsook
fuf(f)luzh(b)bub(b)tub(f) vib(t):naira
ses(b)pil(b)wip(t)pep(f) lub(f):nairne
peg(p)shov(p)zhub(b)fosh(f)vab(b) gof(p):nairobi
fol(p)fin(f)lol(t)so*(b) les(b):naive
vuf(b)sid(t)bub(p)shup(b) las(f):naively
lep(f)pes(b)ves(p) piv(t):naivete
was(p)don(f)liv(t)fis(b)sos(p) sop(t):naja
bob(b)dip(p)vat(b) met(b):naked
sif(t)buv(t)beb(p) sas(t):nakedly
fal(f)rub(f)sil(p)fov(f) nos(t):nakedness
fef(p)fas(f)lub(p)fel(t) faf(p):nakedwood
fif(f)sil(f)*of(f) kuf(t):nam
vid(b)pig(f)fab(p)fes(t) meb(f):namby-pamby
bif(b)giv(b)nel(f) tos(t):nambypamby
su*(f)lo(t)sop(f)bug(f) sob(t):name
bog(b)bep(p)bed(p) nos(b):name-dropping
vit(p)sic(t)pof(f)les(b)vash(t) pub(p):named
raf(b)fow(t)gim(t)lop(p) vid(f):namedropper
kif(b)bib(p)fes(b) zhuw(f):nameko
lish(t)*ol(f)nal(f)bu!(f) vef(b):nameless
ces(p)sif(p)sif(t)bib(p) lum(b):namely
pab(b)rub(t)gef(p)lab(f) biv(b):nameplate
cos(b)vaf(f)baf(b)fob(t) lov(p):names
fof(p)sof(p)bog(t) sip(f):namesake
leb(t)fed(f)bab(b)wip(t)zhom(p) fop(p):namibia
shuf(f)ges(p)faf(p) sec(f):namibian
fuf(p)lew(t)gesh(f)bog(f) dev(t):naming
pazh(f)sel(p)val(t)vul(p) zhub(b):nammu
sof(t)pal(t)nof(f) suf(f):namtar
pur(b)!af(b)vof(p)bab(b) bis(p):nana
wed(p)wof(p)uf(b) sev(t):nancere
caf(p)los(p)mit(b)nus(p) siv(p):nandrolone
pof(p)gash(b)pid(b)pil(f) tov(t):nankeen
fos(f)saf(p)rub(f) lof(p):nanking
fel(p)fof(f)she*(p) fob(p):nanna
dul(f)zhem(f)fel(f)sit(b)fib(b) peg(p):nanny
bom(f)shul(p)dag(t)cob(b) *a*(b):nanogram
wol(f)saf(b)gac(p) tum(p):nanometer
vis(p)caf(b)ti(f) bi!(p):nanomia
nup(f)lag(p)faf(t) pav(f):nanosecond
fab(f)nuf(t)luf(b) gof(b):nantes
was(t)*ub(t)fuf(b) so!(b):nanticoke
sip(f)vuf(t)bam(f) lab(t):nantua
lap(p)fal(f)bev(f)lap(b)sod(b) fo!(b):nantucket
pub(p)das(b)lic(t) vaf(p):naomi
li(t)zhop(t)pob(b)bof(b)meb(p) sel(b):nap
fek(t)!op(t)raw(f) dup(t):napaea
fup(t)gop(p)ef(t) vol(p):napalm
mal(b)beb(t)fip(p) faf(t):nape
sef(t)fen(p)lav(b) wus(f):napha
fuf(t)pil(f)bis(b)zhes(p) bas(p):naphtha
ge!(f)pef(t)lul(t)sob(t) pep(p):naphthalene
sap(t)bep(t)bav(b)par(f) fib(p):napier
pesh(f)ni!(f)nesh(b)bip(t)laf(t) raf(b):napiers
lub(t)fis(b)gozh(f)bib(f)bef(b) sis(b):napkin
sab(f)ge*(p)sad(f)gop(b)bug(p) tuf(t):naples
sut(p)wom(f)gel(t)fug(b)vak(p) guzh(b):napless
biv(p)zhoc(p)fe*(t)fus(p)dub(f) sab(b):napoleon
pazh(p)bob(p)bash(f) kol(b):napoleonic
lif(b)vop(t)fap(p) lif(b):napoli
lud(p)shet(b)vif(b)fow(b)fob(b) sed(f):napping
op(b)mus(b)gef(p)fig(t)sig(t) sov(f):nappy
fuf(f)pef(p)ter(t)vef(b) fuv(f):naprapath
fac(b)vof(b)duf(f)bel(b)sav(b) pap(p):naprapathy
luf(t)zhav(t)wis(f)vub(p)laf(b) for(f):naproxen
dog(f)lel(p)fif(t)kil(f)po*(b) rel(b):naptha
liv(f)lef(p)bef(f)bos(p) bef(p):napu
zher(p)sob(p)feb(t) ful(p):naranjilla
*of(b)fuv(b)fef(b)suf(p) ef(b):narc
